District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.10

Detention of United States prisoners in Washington Asylum and Jail.

The Department of Corrections is hereby authorized and directed to receive and keep in the Washington Asylum and Jail all prisoners committed thereto for offenses against the United States.

History

Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-410.
1973 Ed., § 24-410.

References in Text

“Department of Corrections” was substituted for “Board of Public Welfare” pursuant to § 24-211.03.